Hawaii statutes.
§431:10D-311 Crediting of dividends.
An insurer shall credit annually beginning not later than the fifth policy
year, any dividend arising under a participating industrial life insurance
contract. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next